District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-2801

Annual budget required.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1102, 45 DCR 7193
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 4033, 57 DCR 6242

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-151.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see §§ 702-708 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and §§ 702-708 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 1B 1981 Ed., see §§ 702 to 708 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 4033 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Editor's Notes

School Based Budgeting and Accountability Act of 1998: Section 1101 of D.C. Law 12-175 provided that title XI of the act may be cited as the “School Based Budgeting and Accountability Act of 1998.”